Georgia statutes. TITLE 28 General Assembly
CHAPTER 12 Legislative Review of Taxation

Effective date.

This chapter became effective April 26, 2022.

Editor’s notes.

The former chapter consisted of Code Sections

28-12-1

through 28-12-4, relating to the 2010 Special Council and Committee on Tax Reform and Revenue, was based on Code 1981, §§

28-12-1

—28-12-4, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 729, § 1/HB 1405, and was repealed by Ga. L. 2010, p. 729, § 1/HB 1405, effective July 1, 2012.

The former chapter consisted of Code Sections

28-12-1

through 28-12-3, relating to the Special Joint Committee on Georgia Revenue Structure, was based on Code 1981, §§

28-12-1

—28-12-3, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 236, § 1-1/HB 170, and was repealed by Ga. L. 2015, p. 236, § 1-1/HB 170, effective July 1, 2016.

Ga. L. 2022, p. HB1437, § 1-1/HB 1437, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Tax Reduction and Reform Act of 2022.’”

Ga. L. 2022, p. HB1437, § 5-1(b)/HB 1437, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Tax, penalty, and interest liabilities and refund eligibility for prior taxable years shall not be affected by the passage of this Act and shall continue to be governed by the provisions of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated as they existed for such prior taxable years.”

28-12-1.
Review of state tax credits, deductions, and exemptions; reporting.

On or before May 1, 2023, the House Ways and Means Committee and the Senate Committee on Finance shall jointly undertake a thorough review of any and all state tax credits, deductions, and exemptions. No later than December 1, 2023, said committees shall submit a report of their findings and recommendations to the presiding officers of their respective chambers.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-12-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 114, § 3-1/HB 1437.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 114, § 1-1/HB 1437, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and maybe cited as the ‘Tax Reduction and Reform Act of 2022.’”

Ga. L. 2022, p. 114, § 5-1(b)/HB 1437, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: provides: “Tax, penalty, and interest liabilities and refund eligibility for prior taxable years shall not be affected by the passage of this Act and shall continue to be governed by the provisions of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated as they existed for such prior taxable years.”